Utah statutes.
31A-26-207.   Examination requirements.
(1)  The commissioner may require applicants for any particular class of
license under Section 31A-26-204 to pass an examination as a requirement to
receiving a license.  The examination shall reasonably relate to the specific
license class for which it is prescribed.  The examinations may be
administered by the commissioner or as specified by rule.
(2)  The commissioner shall waive the requirement of an examination for a
nonresident applicant who:
(a)  applies for an insurance adjuster license in this state;
(b)  has been licensed for the same line of authority in another state; and
(c) (i)  is licensed in the state described in Subsection (2)(b) at the time
the applicant applies for an insurance producer license in this state; or
(ii)  if the application is received within 90 days of the cancellation of the
applicant's previous license:
(A)  the prior state certifies that at the time of cancellation, the applicant
was in good standing in that state; or
(B)  the state's producer database records maintained by the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners or the National Association of
Insurance Commissioner's affiliates or subsidiaries, indicates that the
producer is or was licensed in good standing for the line of authority
requested.
(3) (a)  To become a resident licensee in accordance with Sections 31A-26-202
and 31A-26-203, a person licensed as an insurance producer in another state
who moves to this state shall make application within 90 days of establishing
legal residence in this state.
(b)  A person who becomes a resident licensee under Subsection (3)(a) may not
be required to meet prelicensing education or examination requirements to
obtain any line of authority previously held in the prior state unless:
(i)  the prior state would require a prior resident of this state to meet the
prior state's prelicensing education or examination requirements to become a
resident licensee; or
(ii)  the commissioner imposes the requirements by rule.
(4)  The requirements of this section only apply to applicants who are natural
persons.
(5)  The requirements of this section do not apply to members of the Utah
State Bar.
